Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Division of Hospitals and Mental Hygiene

196.350.
Functions of the Division of Hospitals and Mental Hygiene. [Repealed.]

196.360.
Director — Appointment — Duties. [Repealed.]

196.370.
Appointment of assistant director and superintendents. [Repealed.]

196.380.
Duties of superintendents. [Repealed.]

196.390.
Removal of officers and employees. [Repealed.]

196.400.
Transfer of personnel. [Repealed.]

196.410.
Political activities prohibited. [Repealed.]

196.420.
Duties of field liaison officer — Use of other employees. [Repealed.]

196.430.
Qualifications of officers and employes. [Repealed.]

196.440.
Minimum salary of certain officers and employees. [Repealed.]

196.450.
Inspection of institutions. [Repealed.]